Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Property, Financial Affairs, Contracts, Streets, Subdivisionsand Utilities

§ 15-4-301.
Officers and employees; public property; delivery to successor; penalty; enforcement.

Every person, upon the expiration of his term of office or employment, shall deliver to his successor in office all property in his possession belonging to the city or town, or pertaining to the office held. Any person failing to do so within five (5) days after being notified and requested by the manager or president of the governing body, shall forfeit and pay for the use of the city five hundred dollars ($500.00) and all damages caused by his neglect or refusal to deliver. The amount may be recovered in an action brought for that purpose, and the city may by action in the nature of replevin, or mandamus proceedings, enforce the delivery of such property.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 236; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-236; W.S. 1977, §

15-4-230

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to replevin generally, see §§

1-15-301

through

1-15-306

.

As to mandamus generally, see §§

1-30-101

through

1-30-118

.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-210

was renumbered as §

15-4-301

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-302.
Finances; warrants; use for disbursements; exception; limitations; contents; procedure.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all disbursements shall be made by check or warrant signed by the manager and countersigned by the mayor. No check or warrant may be drawn in payment of a claim of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) until the claim is certified by the manager and allowed by resolution of the governing body. Each check or warrant shall specify its purpose and shall be made payable to the order of the person in whose favor it is drawn.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 239; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-239; W.S. 1977, §

15-4-242

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, §§ 2, 4; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-213

was renumbered as §

15-4-302

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-303.
Finances; issuance and sale of bonds generally; purposes; amounts; limitations; exception.

The city or town may by ordinance issue and sell bonds or certificates of indebtedness as follows:

To pay, fund or refund any of its debts;

To purchase, construct, extend, improve and maintain public utility plants named in the ordinance authorizing the issue of the bonds or certificates of indebtedness;

Not to exceed a total outstanding issue of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) for the benefit of the permanent improvement revolving fund;

For defraying the cost of making local improvements:

In intersections of streets and alleys; and

In front of property exempt by law from special assessments, and property owned by the city or town.

For defraying the cost of establishing and maintaining a general system of sewers and of maintaining, altering, relaying and extending existing systems of sewers;

For the purchase, erection and improvement of necessary public buildings;

For establishing garbage crematories or other means of garbage disposal, hospitals, schools, libraries, museums and art galleries;

For changing, controlling or bridging streams or ravines and constructing and repairing bridges within the corporate limits;

Not to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00), to run not longer than ten (10) years, for the benefit of the general fund in case of a failure of the anticipated revenue from sources other than taxation;

To purchase real property for future public use, if the acquisition of the land in the opinion of the governing body is necessary to conform to a master plan adopted and certified for the physical development of the municipality under W.S.

15-1-501

through

15-1-512

.

No bonds except those specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section may be issued or sold unless the governing body is first authorized to do so by a majority of the electors of the city or town voting thereon at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

Bonds issued and sold under this section shall not be sold for less than par value and shall bear interest at a rate established by ordinance.

The funded indebtedness other than that provided in subsection (a)(v) of this section shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the assessed value of the taxable property of the city. When determining indebtedness for the purpose of fixing that limit, bonds issued for the purpose of supplying water shall not be counted. Bonds issued under subsection (a)(v) of this section shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the assessed value of the taxable property of the city or town.

The limitations expressed in this section have no application to refunding public securities issued pursuant to the General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law [§§

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

] except as otherwise provided in that act.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 246; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-246; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

15-4-249

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-220

was renumbered as §

15-4-303

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-304.
Claims; appeals; exception; definition.

Except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

, if any claim against the city is disallowed in whole or in part, the claimant may appeal from the decision of the governing body to the district court of the district in which the city or town is situated pursuant to Rule 12 of the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. “Claim” as used in this section means claims as are presented for audit and not claims for salaries of officers and employees or other fixed charges against the city or town, nor claims covered by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 255; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-255; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-258; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-119” twice.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121” twice.

Editor's notes. —

W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-121

, twice referred to in this section, comprises the Wyoming Government Claims Act.

Former §

15-4-229

was renumbered as §

15-4-304

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Language of this section is clear and unambiguous.

Regan v. City of Casper, 494 P.2d 935,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1972).

Appeal from decision on claim for salaries precluded. —

This section precludes the utilization of appeal proceedings from a decision of the city council on a claim for salaries of officers and employees. Regan v. City of Casper, 494 P.2d 935,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1972).

§ 15-4-305.
Streets; vacation; petition required; consideration.

The governing body has the exclusive power and, by ordinance, may vacate any highway, street, lane or alley, or portion thereof. No vacation may be ordered except upon petition of a majority of the owners owning a majority of the property abutting on the portion proposed to be vacated and extending three hundred (300) feet in either direction from the portion proposed to be vacated. The city or town may demand and receive the value of the land vacated as consideration for the vacation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 270; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-270; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-273; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-242

was renumbered as §

15-4-305

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Prior dedication not affected by section. —

Since § 15-338, W.S. 1957 (similar to this section) was not in effect at the time of a particular dedication, under no circumstances could it enhance or enlarge the interest the defendant city received by the dedication, and once that interest was terminated by vacation the city no longer had any title or interest in the premises. Payne v. Laramie, 398 P.2d 557,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 15-4-306.
Construction or reconstruction of sidewalks and curbs; landowner's duties; notice; assessment; establishing grade and parking width.

All owners of land adjoining any street, lane or alley shall construct or reconstruct a sidewalk and curb along the street, lane or alley next to the land when ordered to do so by the manager. All sidewalks and curbs shall be constructed as designated by the manager. However, the manager shall not require any person to construct a walk or curb in a different manner, or of a different material, than is required of other persons in the same block fronting the street. It is the duty of landowners to keep any sidewalk or curb now constructed, or which may hereafter be constructed in front of the land, in good repair and in safe condition.

If the manager considers it necessary that a sidewalk or curb be constructed, reconstructed or repaired, notice shall be served upon the owner of the land along which it is to be constructed or repaired specifying the manner in which it is to be constructed or repaired and the estimated cost which may be assessed if the city or town does the work. The notice shall be served personally upon the owner, or if he is not to be found within the city or town, it shall be sent to him by registered or certified mail, requesting a return receipt, if his address is known. Otherwise it shall be published once in the official newspaper of the city or town. Unless the owner within two (2) weeks after service, mailing or publication of the notice, begins the construction or repair and completes it without delay, the manager shall have the work done at the expense of the permanent improvement revolving fund. Upon completion of the work, the manager shall certify the cost thereof to the clerk of the city or town. The governing body shall then fix a date for hearing upon the costs. The procedure for notice and hearing shall be as set forth in W.S.

15-6-405

. Upon confirmation of the assessment by the governing body, the charge levied is a lien upon the property as set forth in W.S.

15-6-406

. The governing body may levy and collect the assessment and provide for the manner of sale, redemption and conveyance of lands sold for nonpayment of the assessment in the manner provided in W.S.

15-6-401

through

15-6-448

. When collected the assessment shall be paid into the revolving fund. The manager, upon proper showing made to him, may extend the time within which the construction or repair shall begin or be completed.

Before ordering the construction of any new sidewalk or curb, the manager shall establish its grade and the width of the parking.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 272, 273; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-272, 15.1-273; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-4-275, 15-4-276; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 33, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “15-6-448” for “15-6-447.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-244

was renumbered as §

15-4-306

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 15-4-307.
Construction or reconstruction of sidewalks and curbs; conditions causing injury; liability and proceedings generally.

Any person who renders a street insufficient or unsafe for travel by any excavations or obstructions not authorized by law or ordinance, or is negligent in the management of any authorized excavation or obstruction, or fails to maintain proper guards or lights is liable for all damages recovered by any person injured as a result of the obstruction or negligence. No action may be maintained against the city or town for damages unless the person or persons creating the condition are joined as parties defendant. In case of judgment against the defendants, execution shall at first issue only against the defendant causing the insufficiency or danger, and the city or town is not required to pay the judgment until that execution is returned unsatisfied. If the city or town pays the judgment, it is the owner thereof and may enforce its payment from the other defendants. The city or town is also entitled to execution against them and to take such other proceedings as judgment creditors are entitled to take.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 274; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-274; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-277; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-245

was renumbered as §

15-4-307

by
Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Excavations and obstructions of streets. —

This section does not create a cause of action based on the negligence of public employees of cities and towns for excavations or obstructions of streets. DiFelici v. City of Lander, 2013 WY 141, 312 P.3d 816,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

§ 15-4-308.
Conditions causing injury; defects.

No action may be maintained against the city or town on account of injuries received by means of any defect in the condition of any bridge, street, sidewalk or thoroughfare except as provided by W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-119

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 275; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-275; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-278; Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124 § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-246

was renumbered as §

15-4-308

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Spivey v. City of Casper, 455 P.2d 660,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1969).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 717 (1972).

§ 15-4-309.
Conditions causing injury; obstructions by railways.

No railway company or street railway company, when cleaning their track, may pile up snow or other material and leave it piled upon any street in the city or town. Any such company is liable to any person injured as a result of the obstruction for all damages sustained. If damages are recovered against the city or town for injuries caused by the obstruction, the city may recover from the company responsible.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 276; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-276; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-279; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-247

was renumbered as §

15-4-309

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injuries in connection with ice or snow on nonresidential premises, 95 ALR3d 15.

§ 15-4-310.
Subdividing; survey and plat required; procedure; streets; layout and grading.

If any person subdivides any parcel of ground within the city or town into building lots for the purpose of sale, he shall have it surveyed and platted in accordance with the general laws. When the survey and plats are completed and acknowledged, a copy shall be presented to the city engineer, who shall advise the manager whether it should be accepted or rejected, or a modification directed. The manager shall then present it to the governing body with the recommendation.

When any plat is accepted by the governing body, the clerk shall so certify upon the face of the plat, and it may then be recorded as provided by the general laws relating to the making and filing of plats. Except as otherwise provided by law, all provisions of the general laws relating to the making and filing of plats apply to the city. No person is entitled to damages for laying out or extension of any street or alley over any lot or parcel of land sold or offered for sale contrary to law.

The acceptance of the plat or addition of any ground, either within or outside the limits of the city or town, does not make it liable to grade the streets therein designated, or responsible for an insufficiency in a street, until the governing body directs they be graded and opened for travel.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 277; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-277; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-280; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-248

was renumbered as §

15-4-310

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-311.
Removing snow; persons responsible; cost.

If the owners or occupants of property within the city fail to promptly remove accumulations of snow or other obstructions from the sidewalks, or streets or alleys on which their property abuts, when required to do so by ordinance, the manager may have it removed and the cost of removal assessed against the property. The cost of removal constitutes a lien against the property to be collected in the same manner as special assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 278; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-278; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-281; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-249

was renumbered as §

15-4-311

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury or damage caused by snowplowing or snow removal operations and equipment, 83 ALR4th 5.

§ 15-4-312.
Public utilities; installation.

The city or town may install, purchase, construct and operate any street railway and any gas, water, ice, heat, power, light or other plant for the furnishing of any commodity or service, or other public utility, and engage in the manufacture, production, purchase and sale of gas, water, ice, coal, heat, power, light or other commodities.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 279; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-279; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-282; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-250

was renumbered as §

15-4-312

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-313.
Public utilities; manner of disposal.

No public utility owned by the city, whether acquired prior to the adoption of this article or thereafter, may be sold, leased or otherwise disposed of and no real property may be sold unless the full terms of the sale or other disposition, together with the price to be paid, is published in the official paper of the city or town once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, before final action of the governing body. The proposition shall then be submitted to a vote of the people for ratification or rejection at the next general municipal election and ratified by at least two-thirds (2/3) majority vote of electors voting upon the question.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 280; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-280; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-283; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

15-4-251

was renumbered as §

15-4-313

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-314.
Applicability of article.

The provisions of this article shall apply to any form of alternative city government authorized under this chapter.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 2.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.